Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
General Provisions

§ 63-7-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Highway Traffic Regulation Law – Equipment and Identification Regulations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8126; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-7-3.
Construction.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8282; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-7-5.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the meanings ascribed to the words and phrases in Article 3 of Chapter 3, of this title shall be fully applicable to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8126; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-7-7.
Operation of vehicle in violation of chapter.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to drive or move or for the owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved on any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in such unsafe condition as to endanger any person, or which does not contain those parts or is not at all times equipped with such lamps and other equipment in proper condition and adjustment as required in this chapter, or which is equipped in any manner in violation of this chapter, or for any person to do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8228; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-7-9.
Applicability of chapter.

Except as may otherwise be provided in this chapter, the provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment on vehicles shall not apply to implements of husbandry, road machinery, road rollers, or farm tractors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8228; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-7-11.
Requirements as to use of lights.

Every vehicle upon a highway within this state during the period from sunset to sunrise and at any other time when there is not sufficient light to render clearly discernible any person on the highway at a distance of five hundred feet ahead shall be equipped with lighted front and rear lamps as respectively required in Section 63-7-13 for different classes of vehicles and subject to exemption with reference to lights on parked vehicles as hereinafter stated in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-01; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 9; Laws, 1956, ch. 381; Laws, 1968, ch. 543, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1968).

§ 63-7-13.
Requirements as to lighting equipment.

Head lamps on motor vehicles.— Every motor vehicle other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle shall be equipped with at least two (2) head lamps with at least one (1) on each side of the front of the motor vehicle, which head lamps shall comply with the requirements and limitations set forth in Section 63-7-31.

Head lamps on motorcycles.— Every motorcycle shall be equipped with at least one (1) and not more than two (2) head lamps which shall comply with the requirements and limitations set forth in Section 63-7-31.

Rear lamps.— Every motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, pole trailer and any other vehicle which is being drawn in a train of vehicles shall be equipped with at least one (1) rear lamp mounted on the rear, which, when lighted, shall emit a red light plainly visible from a distance of five hundred (500) feet to the rear. However, any antique automobile, as defined under Section 27-19-47, and any street rod, as defined under Section 27-19-56.6, may be equipped with one or more rear lamps that have been modified to emit a blue, violet or purple light resembling rear lamps appearing on some American automobiles originally manufactured in the 1940s and 1950s.

Either a rear lamp or a separate lamp shall be so constructed and placed as to illuminate with a white light the rear registration plate and render it clearly readable from a distance of fifty (50) feet to the rear. Any rear lamp or tail lamps, together with any separate lamp for illuminating the rear registration plate, shall be so wired as to be lighted whenever the head lamps, cowl lamps or fender lamps are lighted.

Lamps on bicycles.— Every bicycle shall be equipped with a lighted white lamp on the front thereof visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of at least five hundred (500) feet in front of such bicycle and shall also be equipped with a reflex mirror reflector or lamp on the rear exhibiting a red light visible under like conditions from a distance of at least five hundred (500) feet to the rear of such bicycle.

Lights on other vehicles.— All vehicles not required in this chapter to be equipped with special lighted lamps shall carry one or more lights, lamps or lanterns displaying a white light, visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet to the front of such vehicle and shall display a reflex reflector or red light visible under like conditions from a distance of not less than three hundred (300) feet to the rear of such vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-01; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 9; Laws, 1956, ch. 381; Laws, 1968, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 402, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 63-7-15.
Additional lighting requirements for certain vehicles.

Every bus or truck.— On every bus or truck, whatever its size, there shall be at least the following lighting devices and reflectors:-On the front, two head lamps, one at each side. On the rear, one red tail lamp; one red or amber stop light; two red reflectors, one at each side.

Every bus or truck eighty inches or more in width.— On every bus or truck eighty inches or more in overall width there shall be at least the following lighting devices and reflectors: On the front, two head lamps, one at each side; two amber clearance lamps, one at each side. On the rear, one red tail lamp; one red or amber stop light; two red clearance lamps, one at each side; two red reflectors, one at each side. On each side, one amber side-marked lamp, located at or near the front; one red side-marker lamp, located at or near the rear; one amber reflector, located at or near the front; one red reflector, located at or near the rear.

Every truck tractor.— On every truck tractor there shall be at least the following lighting devices and reflectors. On the front, two head lamps, one at each side; two amber clearance lamps, one at each side. On the rear, one red tail lamp; one red or amber stop light.

Every semi-trailer or trailer in excess of three thousand (3,000) pounds gross weight.— On every semi-trailer or full trailer having a gross weight in excess of three thousand (3,000) pounds, there shall be at least the following lighting devices and reflectors: On the front, two amber clearance lamps, one at each side. On the rear, one red tail lamp; one red or amber stop light; two red clearance lamps, one at each side; two red reflectors, one at each side. On each side, one amber side-marker lamp, located at or near the front; one red side-marker lamp, located at or near the rear; one amber reflector, located at or near the front; one red reflector, located at or near the rear.

Every semi-trailer or trailer weighing three thousand (3,000) pounds gross or less.— On every semi-trailer or full trailer having a gross weight of three thousand (3,000) pounds or less, there shall be at least the following lighting devices and reflectors: On the front, no requirement. On the rear, one red tail lamp; two red reflectors, one at each side; one red or amber stop light if the semi-trailer or full trailer obscures the stop light on the towing vehicle.

Every pole-trailer.— On every pole-trailer there shall be at least the following lighting devices and reflectors: On the front, no requirement. On the rear, one red tail lamp; two red reflectors, one at each side, placed to indicate extreme width of the pole-trailer or its load, whichever is wider. (A red lantern or flag on the end of a projecting load shall be required as provided in Section 63-7-47.) On each side, on the rearmost support for the load, one combination marker lamp showing amber to the front and red to the side and rear, mounted to indicate maximum width of the pole-trailer or load; one red reflector, located at or near the rear.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-02; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 10.

§ 63-7-17.
Use of spot lamps, auxiliary driving lamps, and signal lamps.

Spot lamps.— Any motor vehicle or motorcycle may be equipped with not to exceed one (1) spot lamp. Every lighted spot lamp shall be so aimed and used upon approaching another vehicle that no part of the beam will be directed into the eyes of the approaching driver. Spot lamps may not emit other than either a white or amber light.

Auxiliary driving lamps.— Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two (2) auxiliary driving lamps mounted on the front at a height not less than twelve (12) nor more than forty-two (42) inches above the level surface of which the vehicle stands. Every such auxiliary driving lamp or lamps shall meet the requirements and limitations set forth in subsection (3) of this section.

Signal lamps.— Whenever a motor vehicle is equipped with a signal lamp to comply with the provisions of Section 63-3-709, the signal lamp shall be so constructed and located on the vehicle as to give a signal which shall be plainly visible in normal sunlight from a distance of one hundred (100) feet to the rear of the vehicle but shall not project a glaring or dazzling light.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-10; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 18; Laws, 1978, ch. 470, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 63-7-19.
Lights on police and emergency vehicles; lights on rural mail carrier vehicles; lights on sanitation vehicles; lights on military funeral procession escort vehicles; when lights authorized by this section must be used.

Except as otherwise provided for unmarked vehicles under Section 19-25-15 and Section 25-1-87, every police vehicle shall be marked with blue lights. Every ambulance and special use EMS vehicle as defined in Section 41-59-3 shall be marked with red lights front and back and also may be marked with white and amber lights in addition to red lights. Every emergency management/civil defense vehicle, including emergency response vehicles of the Department of Environmental Quality, shall be marked with blinking, rotating or oscillating red lights. Official vehicles of a 911 Emergency Communications District may be marked with red and white lights. Every wrecker or other vehicle used for emergency work, except vehicles authorized to use blue or red lights, shall be marked with blinking, oscillating or rotating amber-colored lights to warn other vehicles to yield the right-of-way, as provided in Section 63-3-809. Only police vehicles used for emergency work may be marked with blinking, oscillating or rotating blue lights to warn other vehicles to yield the right-of-way. Only law enforcement vehicles, fire vehicles, private or department-owned vehicles used by firemen of volunteer fire departments which receive funds pursuant to Section 83-1-39 when responding to calls, emergency management/civil defense vehicles, emergency response vehicles of the Department of Environmental Quality, ambulances used for emergency work, and 911 Emergency Communications District vehicles may be marked with blinking, oscillating or rotating red lights to warn other vehicles to yield the right-of-way. This section shall not apply to school buses carrying lighting devices in accordance with Section 63-7-23.

Emergency response vehicles listed in this subsection (1) are also authorized to use alternating flashing headlights when responding to any emergency.

Any vehicle operated by a United States rural mail carrier for the purpose of delivering United States mail may be marked with two (2) amber-colored lights on front top of the vehicle and two (2) red-colored lights on rear top of the vehicle and alternatively or additionally may be marked with a white, flashing strobe light on the roof of the vehicle so as to warn approaching travelers to decrease their speed because of danger of colliding with the mail carrier as he stops and starts along the edge of the road, street or highway.

Any sanitation vehicle operated by a county, municipality or other political subdivision of this state or by a contractor under contract with a county, municipality or other political subdivision of this state to collect solid waste, refuse or recyclable material may be marked with flashing or oscillating white- or amber-colored lights so as to warn approaching travelers to decrease speed because of the danger of colliding with the sanitation collection vehicle as it stops and starts along the road, street or highway.

Any nonlaw enforcement vehicle being used to lead and facilitate the movement of a military funeral procession may be marked with blinking, rotating or oscillating purple lights. “Military funeral procession” means two (2) or more vehicles accompanying the body of a deceased member of the United States Armed Forces, or traveling to the church, chapel or other location at which the funeral service or entombment is to be held.

Any operator of an emergency vehicle authorized to be marked with blinking, rotating or oscillating lights in accordance with this section, shall use blinking, rotating or oscillating lights when operating the emergency vehicle at a speed in excess of thirty (30) miles per hour over the posted speed limit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-08; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 16; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 5; Laws, 1962, ch. 527; Laws, 1964, ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 484, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 333, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 517, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 581, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 425, § 5; Laws, 2006, ch. 468, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 314, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 461, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 451, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 63-7-20.
Use of blue and red lights and alternating flashing headlights.

It is unlawful for any person, other than a law enforcement officer on duty, to use or display blue lights on a motor vehicle as provided for in Section 63-7-19.

It is unlawful for any person to use or display red lights on a motor vehicle except as provided for in Section 63-7-19. It is not unlawful for the red lights authorized for private or department-owned vehicles used by firemen of volunteer fire departments, as provided in Section 63-7-19, to remain mounted on such vehicles when the lights are not in use.

It is unlawful for any vehicle to use alternating flashing headlights except an emergency vehicle as provided in Section 63-7-19.

A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-08.5; Laws, 1972, ch. 352, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 398, § 2; Laws, 1987, ch. 333, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 517, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 581, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 565, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1997).

§ 63-7-21.
Mounting of electric lamps, clearance lamps, and side-marker lamps.

Where electric lamps are used to meet the requirements of Section 63-7-11, they shall be securely and permanently affixed to the permanent structure of the motor vehicle, except for the combination marker lamps on pole-trailers prescribed in subsection (6) of Section 63-7-15.

Required clearance lamps shall be mounted in such a manner as to indicate the extreme width of the motor vehicle and as near the top thereof as practicable.

Side-marker lamps may be in combination with clearance lamps and may use the same light source.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-03; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 11.

§ 63-7-23.
Color of lighting devices.

The color of lighting devices shall be as follows:

All front clearance lamps, and all side marker lamps, except the one on each side at or near the rear of any bus, truck, truck tractor, semitrailer, full trailer or pole trailer, shall when lighted display an amber color.

No red lighting device of any character shall be mounted at any place other than on or near the rear of any bus, truck, truck tractor, semitrailer, full trailer or pole trailer. However, school buses owned by or under contract with a school district of this state may have affixed at or near the front end thereof red lighting devices that may be caused to blink when the school bus is stopped or in the process of stopping for the purpose of loading or unloading school children. A school bus also may be equipped with a white, flashing strobe light on the roof of the vehicle installed according to standards promulgated by the Mississippi Department of Education as authorized under Section 37-41-1(c).

All rear clearance lamps, the side marker lamps on each side at or near the rear, and any other lamps mounted on the rear, on any bus, truck, truck tractor, semitrailer, full trailer or pole trailer shall when lighted display a red color. However, the stoplight or other warning device on the rear of any motor vehicle may be red or amber.

Backing lights of any color may be mounted on the rear of any motor vehicle if the switch controlling such lights be so arranged that they may be turned on only when the vehicle is in reverse gear. Such backing lights when unlighted shall be so colored or otherwise arranged as not to reflect objectionable glare in the eyes of drivers of vehicles approaching from the rear.

Auxiliary white lights mounted on or near the rear of a motor vehicle, or visible from the rear of the vehicle, shall not be prohibited under the provisions of this section if (a) the vehicle’s gross weight is less than twelve thousand one (12,001) pounds, and (b) the lights are designed by the motor vehicle manufacturer or an after-market parts manufacturer so that they may only be illuminated whenever the vehicle is not in motion and the transmission of the vehicle is not capable of transmitting power to the wheels.

No provision of this section shall be so construed as to prohibit the use of any white light or lights for the purpose of illuminating license plates.

Any lamps illuminated when the vehicle is in motion, other than those expressly required or permitted by the provisions of this chapter or other law, shall, if visible from the front, display only a white or amber light; if visible from either side, display an amber light; and if visible from the rear, display a red light.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8229-04, 8229-08; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, §§ 12, 16; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 5; Laws, 1962, chs. 526, 527; Laws, 1964, ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 484, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 556, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 461, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 63-7-25.
Visibility of clearance, side-marker, and tail lamps.

Clearance, side-marker, and tail lamps shall, when lighted, be capable of being seen at a distance of five hundred feet under normal atmospheric conditions during the time when lights are required. The light from front clearance lamps shall be visible to the front, from side-marker lamps to the side, and from rear clearance and tail lamps to the rear, of the motor vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-05; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 13.

§ 63-7-27.
Performance and visibility of stop lights; incorporation with tail lamps.

Stop lights shall be actuated upon application of the service (foot) brake and shall be capable of being seen and distinguished from a distance of one hundred feet to the rear of the vehicle in normal daylight. Stop lights shall not project a glaring or dazzling light.

A stop light may be incorporated with a tail lamp.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-06; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 14.

§ 63-7-29.
Mounting, visibility and color of reflectors; incorporation with tail lamps.

Mounting of reflectors.— No reflector required by the provisions of this chapter shall be mounted upon the motor vehicle at a height to exceed sixty inches, nor less than twenty-four inches, above the ground on which the motor vehicle stands.

Visibility of reflectors.— Every reflector shall be of such size and characteristics as to be readily visible at night from all distances within five hundred feet to fifty feet from the motor vehicle when directly in front of a normal headlight beam.

Rear reflectors incorporated with tail lamps.— One or both of the required rear red reflectors may be incorporated within the tail lamp or tail lamps; any such tail lamps shall be located within the height limits specified for reflectors. Whether or not the rear reflectors are incorporated in tail lamps, they shall be located on the rear of the motor vehicle at opposite sides and shall also meet the requirements as to visibility set forth in this section.

Color of reflectors.— All reflectors mounted on any bus, truck, truck tractor, semi-trailer, full trailer, or pole-trailer, shall reflect an amber color, except those placed on the rear and on the sides nearest to the rear thereof, which shall reflect a red color.

Any reflectors on a vehicle, other than those expressly required or permitted by the provisions of this chapter, shall, if visible from the front, reflect a white or amber light, if visible from either side, reflect an amber light, and if visible from the rear, reflect a red light.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8229-07, 8229-08; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, §§ 15, 16; Laws, 1950, ch. 407, § 5; Laws, 1962, ch. 527; Laws, 1964, ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 484, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1970.

§ 63-7-31.
Multiple-beam road-lighting equipment; distributions of light; beam indicator.

Except as hereinafter provided in this chapter, the head lamps or the auxiliary driving lamp or the auxiliary passing lamp or combinations thereof on motor vehicles other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle shall be so arranged that the driver may control the selection between distributions of light projected to different elevations, subject to the following requirements and limitations:

There shall be an uppermost distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed and of such intensity as to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least 350 feet ahead for all conditions of loading.

There shall be lowermost distribution of light, or composite beam so aimed and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least 100 feet ahead; and on a straight level road under any condition of loading none of the high-intensity portion of the beam shall be directed to strike the eyes of an approaching driver.

Every new motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, registered in this state after January 1, 1954, which has multiple-beam road-lighting equipment shall be equipped with a beam indicator, which shall be lighted whenever the uppermost distribution of light from the head lamps is in use, and shall not otherwise be lighted. Said indicator shall be so designed and located that when lighted it will be readily visible without glare to the driver of the vehicle so equipped.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-11; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 19; Laws, 1954, ch. 326, § 1.

§ 63-7-33.
Multiple-beam road-lighting equipment; control by operator.

Whenever a motor vehicle is being operated on a highway or shoulder adjacent thereto during the times specified by law, the driver shall use a distribution of light, or composite beam, directed high enough and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a safe distance in advance of the vehicle, subject to the requirement that whenever the driver of a vehicle approaches an oncoming vehicle within five hundred feet, such driver shall use a distribution of light or composite beam so aimed that the glaring rays are not projected into the eyes of the oncoming driver.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-12; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 20; Laws, 1954, ch. 326, § 2.

§ 63-7-35.
Single-beam road-lighting equipment.

Head lamps arranged to provide a single distribution of light not supplemented by auxiliary driving lamps shall be permitted on motor vehicles manufactured and sold prior to April 10, 1948 in lieu of multiple-beam road-lighting equipment specified in Section 63-7-31 if the single distribution of light complies with the following requirements and limitations:

The head lamps shall be so aimed that when the vehicle is not loaded none of the high-intensity portion of the light shall at a distance of twenty-five feet ahead project higher than a level of five inches below the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes, and in no case higher than forty-two inches above the level on which the vehicle stands at a distance of seventy-five feet ahead.

The intensity shall be sufficient to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least two hundred feet.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-13; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 21.

§ 63-7-37.
Applicability of Sections 63-7-31 through 63-7-35.

The provisions of Sections 63-7-31 through 63-7-35, relative to lighting equipment, shall take effect and be operative with respect to equipment installed in motor vehicles after April 10, 1948 and with respect to the equipment on other motor vehicles, the provisions of Laws, 1938, ch. 200, shall govern unless new equipment is installed therein, in which event such new equipment shall be governed by the provisions of said sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-14; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 22.

§ 63-7-39.
Display of lights on parked vehicles.

Whenever a vehicle is parked or stopped upon a highway whether attended or unattended during the times mentioned in Section 63-7-11, there shall be displayed upon the left side of such vehicle one or more lamps projecting a white or amber light visible under normal atmospheric conditions from a distance of five hundred feet to the front of such vehicle and one or more lamps projecting a red light visible under like conditions from a distance of five hundred feet to the rear. However, local authorities may provide by ordinance that no lights used be displayed upon any such vehicle when parked in accordance with local ordinances upon a highway where there is sufficient light to reveal any person within a distance of five hundred feet upon such highway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-15; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 23; Laws, 1960, ch. 407.

§ 63-7-41.
Sale, use, etc., of lamps modifying original design or performance of vehicle.

No person shall have for sale, sell or offer for sale for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer or use upon any such vehicle any head lamp, auxiliary driving lamp, rear lamp, signal lamp or reflector which reflector is required hereunder, or parts of any of the foregoing, which tend to change the original design or performance, unless of a type which has been submitted to the department of public safety and approved by it.

No person shall have for sale, sell or offer for sale for use upon or as part of the equipment of a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer any lamp or device mentioned in this section which has been approved by the department unless such lamp or device bears thereon the trademark or name under which it is approved so as to be legible when installed.

No person shall use upon any motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer any lamps mentioned in this section unless said lamps are mounted, adjusted and aimed in accordance with instructions of the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8246; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1954, ch. 326, § 3.

§ 63-7-43.
Authority of department as to lighting devices.

The department is hereby authorized to approve or disapprove lighting devices and to issue and enforce regulations establishing standards and specifications for the approval of such lighting devices, their installation, aiming, and readjustment. Such regulations shall correlate with and, so far as practicable, conform to the then current standards and specifications of the Society of Automotive Engineers applicable to such equipment.

The department is hereby required to approve or disapprove any lighting device, of a type on which approval is specifically required in this chapter within a reasonable time after such device has been submitted.

The department is further authorized to set up the procedure which shall be followed when any lighting device is submitted for approval.

The department upon approving any lighting device shall issue to the applicant a certificate of approval together with any instructions determined by it.

The department shall publish lists of all lighting devices by name and type which have been approved by it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8247; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1954, ch. 326, § 4.

§ 63-7-45.
Revocation or suspension of approval of lighting device.

When the department has reason to believe that an approved lighting device as being sold commercially does not comply with the requirements of this chapter, it may, after giving thirty days’ previous notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for such device in this state, conduct a hearing upon the question of compliance of said approved device. After said hearing the department shall determine whether said approved device meets the requirements of this chapter. If said device does not meet such requirements, it shall give notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for such device in this state.

If after the expiration of ninety days after such notice the person holding the certificate of approval for such device has failed to satisfy the department that said approved device as thereafter to be sold meets the requirements of this chapter, the department shall suspend or revoke the approval issued therefor until or unless such device is resubmitted to and retested by an authorized testing agency and is found to meet the requirements of this chapter. The department may require that all said devices sold since the notification following the hearing be replaced with devices that do comply with the requirements of this chapter. The department may at the time of the retest purchase in the open market and submit to the testing agency one or more sets of such approved devices, and if such device upon such retest fails to meet the requirements of this chapter, the department may refuse to renew the certificate of approval of such device.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8248; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-7-47.
Display of flag on projecting load; display of rotating or oscillating amber strobe-type lamp or light-emitting diode light on projecting load during certain hours of the day.

Whenever the load upon any vehicle extends to the rear four (4) feet or more beyond the rear or body of such vehicle, there shall be displayed at the extreme rear end of the load a red flag or cloth not less than sixteen (16) inches square.

From one-half (1/2) hour before sunset to one-half (1/2) hour after sunrise, any vehicle transporting a load of timber products that extends more than four (4) feet beyond the bed or trailer of that vehicle, shall have affixed as close as practical to the end of the load a rotating or oscillating amber strobe-type lamp or light-emitting diode light.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-16; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 24; Laws, 2001, ch. 557, § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 434, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 63-7-49.
Electrical connections between towing and towed vehicles.

Means for establishing electric connection between towing and towed vehicles, and other detachable electric connections, shall be mechanically and electrically adequate, and free of short or open circuits. Suitable provision shall be made in every detachable connection to afford reasonable assurance against accidental disconnection. Precaution shall be taken to provide sufficient slack in the connecting wire or cable without twisting or kinking thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8229-09; Laws, 1948, ch. 343, § 17.

§ 63-7-51.
General vehicle brake equipment requirements.

Every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and hold such vehicle, including two separate means of applying the brakes, each of which means shall be effective to apply the brakes to at least two wheels. If these two separate means of applying the brakes are connected in any way, they shall be so constructed that failure of any one part of the operating mechanism shall not leave the motor vehicle without brakes on at least two wheels.

Every motorcycle, and bicycle with motor attached, when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with at least one brake, which may be operated by hand or foot.

Every trailer carrying over one ton, when operated upon a highway, shall be equipped with brakes adequate to control the movement thereof and to stop and to hold such vehicle, and so designed to be applied by the driver of the towing motor vehicle from its cab; said brakes shall be so designed and connected that in case of an accidental breakaway of the towed vehicle, the brakes shall be automatically applied.

Every new motor vehicle, except a motorcycle, hereafter sold in this state and operated upon the highways, and every new trailer, except a trailer of two axles of less than 2,000 pounds gross towed by an automobile, hereafter sold in this state and operated upon the highways, shall be equipped with service brakes upon all wheels of every such vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8249; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-7-53.
Stopping ability of brakes; maintenance and adjustment of brakes.

The service brakes upon any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles shall be adequate to stop such vehicle or vehicles when traveling twenty miles per hour within a distance of thirty feet when upon dry asphalt or concrete pavement surface free from loose material where the grade does not exceed one per cent.

Under the above conditions the hand brake shall be adequate to stop such vehicle or vehicles within a distance of fifty-five feet and said hand brake shall be adequate to hold such vehicle or vehicles stationary on any grade upon which operated.

Under the above conditions, the service brakes upon a motor vehicle equipped with two-wheel brakes only, and when permitted under Section 63-7-51, shall be adequate to stop the vehicle within a distance of forty feet and the hand brake adequate to stop the vehicle within a distance of fifty-five feet.

All braking distances specified in this section shall apply to all vehicles mentioned, whether such vehicles are not loaded or are loaded to the maximum capacity permitted under law.

All brakes shall be maintained in good working order and shall be so adjusted as to operate as equally as practicable with respect to the wheels on opposite sides of the vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8249; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-7-55.
Mufflers.

Every motor vehicle shall at all times be equipped with a muffler in good working order and in constant operation to prevent excessive or unusual noise and annoying smoke. No person shall use a muffler cutout, bypass or similar device upon a motor vehicle on a highway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8251; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-7-57.
Mirrors.

Every motor vehicle which is so constructed or loaded as to obstruct the driver’s view to the rear thereof from the driver’s position shall be equipped with a mirror so located as to reflect to the driver a view of the highway for a distance of at least two hundred feet to the rear of such vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8252; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.